Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-106 Restrictions on business.
Any insurer which anywhere in the United States transacts any class of
insurance other than title insurance is not eligible for the issuance of a
certificate of authority to transact title insurance in this State nor for the
renewal thereof, nor shall title insurance be transacted, underwritten or
issued by any insurer transacting or licensed to transact any other kind of
insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next